sk-SK: Forma leštidla na topánky: Aerosólový sprej; Krém; Pena; Gél; Kvapalina; Roztok; Pasta; Samoleštiaca špongia; Vosk; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik laštila za cipele: Aerosol sprej; Krema; Pjena; Gel; Tekućina; Losion; Pasta; Spužva za samostalno poliranje; Vosak; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบของน้ำยาขัดรองเท้า: สเปรย์ละอองลอย; ครีม; โฟม; เจล; แบบเหลว; โลชั่น; เนื้อครีม; ฟองน้ำขัดเงาแบบมีน้ำยาในตัว; ขี้ผึ้ง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Forma da graxa para sapatos: Spray aerossol; Creme; Espuma; Gel; Líquido; Loção; Creme; Esponja autobrilhante; Cera; Outro
zh-TW: 鞋油形態: 氣溶膠噴霧; 鞋油; 泡沫; 凝膠; 液體; 保養乳; 膏劑; 即亮海綿刷; 鞋蠟; 其他
es: Forma del betún para zapatos: Aerosol; Crema; Espuma; Gel; Líquido; Loción; Pasta; Esponja autobrillante; Cera; Otros
ro-RO: Forma cremei de pantofi: Spray cu aerosoli; Cremă; Spumă; Gel; Lichid; Loțiune; Pastă; Burete pentru luciu; Ceară; Altele
sv: Skokrämsform: Aerosolspray; Kräm; Skum; Gel; Vätska; Lotion; Pasta; Självglänsande svamp; Vax; Annat
da: Skocremeform: Aerosolspray; Creme; Skum; Gel; Væske; Lotion; Pasta; Selvglinsende svamp; Voks; Andet
it: Forma di lucido da scarpe: Spray aerosol; Crema; Schiuma; Gel; Liquido; Lozione; Pasta; Spugna autolucidante; Cera; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika polirne paste za čevlje: Aerosolni sprej; Krema; Pena; Gel; Tekočina; Losjon; Pasta; Gobica za samopoliranje; Vosek; Drug
pt-PT: Forma de graxa para calçado: Spray aerossol; Creme; Espuma; Gel; Líquido; Loção; Pasta; Esponja autobrilhante; Cera; Outro
el: Μορφή βερνικιού παπουτσιών: Σπρέι αεροζόλ; Κρέμα; Αφρός; Τζελ; Υγρό; Λοσιόν; Πάστα; Αυτογυαλιζόμενο σφουγγάρι; Κερί; Άλλο
nb: Skokremformat: Aerosolspray; Krem; Skum; Gel; Væske; Krem; Lim; Selvglansende svamp; Voks; Annet
vi: Dạng xi đánh giày: Bình xịt sol khí; Kem; Bọt xốp; Gel; Lỏng; Dầu dưỡng; Sáp; Miếng mút đánh bóng tự động; Sáp; Khác
tr: Ayakkabı cilası formu: Aerosol sprey; Krem; Köpük; Jel; Sıvı; Losyon; Macun; Kendinden parlatıcı sünger; Vaks; Diğer
ja: 靴磨きフォーム: エアゾールスプレー; クリーム; フォーム; ゲル; リキッド; ローション; ペースト; セルフシャインスポンジ; ワックス; その他
hu: Cipőtisztító forma: Aeroszolos; Krém; Hab; Gél; Folyadék; Lotion; Paszta; Önfényesítő szivacs; Viasz; Egyéb
fi: Kengänkiillotusmuoto: Aerosolisuihke; Lankki; Vaahto; Geeli; Nestemäinen; Nestemäinen lankki; Tahna; Itsekiillotussieni; Vaha; Muu
cs: Podoba leštidla na boty: Aerosolový sprej; Krém; Pěna; Gel; Tekuté; Emulze/mléko; Pasta; Samolešticí houba; Vosk; Jiné
fr: Format du produit de cirage: Spray aérosol; Crème; Mousse; Gel; Liquide; Lotion; Pâte; Éponge auto-brillante; Cire; Autre
pl: Formularz pasty do butów: Rozpylacz aerozoli; Krem; Pianka; Żel; Płyn; Balsam; Pasta; Gąbka samopołyskowa; Wosk; Inne
lt-LT: Batų kremo forma: Aerozolinis purškalas; Kremas; Putos; Gelis; Skystis; Losjonas; Pasta; Savaime blizganti kempinė; Vaškas; Kita
bg-BG: Форма за боя за обувки: Аерозолен спрей; Крем; Пяна; Гел; Течност; Лосион; Паста; Гъба за полиране; Восък; Друго
ko: 구두약 형태: 에어로졸 스프레이; 크림; 거품; 젤; 액상; 로션; 페이스트; 광택 스펀지; 왁스; 기타
nl: Schoenpoetsvorm: Spuitbus; Crème; Schuim; Gel; Vloeistof; Lotion; Schoensmeer; Zelfglanzende spons; Was; Overig
de: Schuhcremeform: Aerosolspray; Creme; Schaumstoff; Gel; Flüssig; Lotion; Paste; Selbstglanzschwamm; Wachs; Sonstiges
en: Shoe polish form: Aerosol spray; Cream; Foam; Gel; Liquid; Lotion; Paste; Self-shine sponge; Wax; Other
ru: Форма средства для обуви: Аэрозольный спрей; Крем; Пена; Гель; Жидкость; Лосьон; Паста; Губка для придания блеска; Воск; Другое
zh-CN: 鞋油类型: 喷雾剂; 乳霜; 泡沫; 凝胶; 液体; 乳液; 膏; 自亮海绵; 蜡; 其他